Utah statutes.
61-2b-23.   Reciprocal licensure.

An applicant for licensure or certification in this state who is licensed or certified under the laws of any other state, territory, or district may obtain a license or certification in this state upon the terms and conditions determined by the division and the board, if, in the determination of the division and the board:

(1)  the state, territory, or the District of Columbia is considered to have substantially equivalent licensing laws for real estate appraisers;

(2)  the laws of that state, territory, or the District of Columbia accord substantially equal reciprocal rights to a person licensed or certified and in good standing in this state; and

(3)  no formal charges alleging violation of state appraisal licensing or certification laws have been filed against the applicant by the applicant's state of domicile.

